Mississippi, session 2026, HB4174.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The right of suffrage is hereby fully and completely restored to John Cook of Lamar County, Mississippi, who was disqualified as an elector as a result of his conviction for the crime of Grand Larceny in Panola County, on April 20, 1979, for which he was sentenced to serve sixty (60) months under the supervision of the Mississippi Department of Corrections.  On February 18, 1980, in Panola County, he was sentenced to serve two (2) years in the custody of the Mississippi Department of Corrections for the crime of Grand Larceny.  On October 24, 1980, in Panola County, he was sentenced to serve seven (7) years in the custody of the Mississippi Department of Corrections for the crime of Burglary-General to run consecutively. He was discharged on December 26, 1992.  The Legislature is informed that he has since conducted himself as a law-abiding and honorable citizen in a good and lawful manner. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.